Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2,136
Surrender of charter upon foreign
nonprofit conversion.

(MBCA
9.33) (a) Whenever a domestic business corporation has adopted and approved,
in the manner required by sections 21-2,133 to 21-2,138, a plan of nonprofit
conversion providing for the corporation to be converted to a foreign nonprofit
corporation, articles of charter surrender shall be signed on behalf of the
corporation by any officer or other duly authorized representative. The articles
of charter surrender shall set forth:

(1) The name of the
corporation;

(2)
A statement that the articles of charter surrender are being filed in connection
with the conversion of the corporation to a foreign nonprofit corporation;

(3) A statement that
the foreign nonprofit conversion was duly approved by the shareholders in
the manner required by the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act and the
articles of incorporation; and

(4) The corporation's new jurisdiction of incorporation.

(b) The articles of
charter surrender shall be delivered by the corporation to the Secretary of
State for filing. The articles of charter surrender shall take effect on the
effective time provided in section 21-206.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 136.